Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4665.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1138a. (1) The governing body of a public school shall consider a pupil's absence from school to be an excused absence if both of the following apply: (a) The pupil is absent from school to attend a scheduled competition, exhibition, or event offered by any of the following organizations: (i) The National FFA Organization. (ii) The Michigan FFA association. (iii) A 4-H club. (iv) Any other agricultural organization approved by the board of the school district in which the pupil's school is located. (b) The pupil is in good academic standing, as determined by the governing body of the pupil's school. (2) This section does not permit a pupil to exceed the number of excused absences allowed by the pupil's school district. (3) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall ensure that its attendance policy is consistent with this section.